Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 13.5
COLORADO LOCAL GOVERNMENT ELECTION CODE

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

Law reviews:

For article, "The New

C

olorado Local Government Election

C

ode: The Greatest Thing Since Sliced Bread", see 43 Colo. Law. 39 (Sept. 2014).

Section

PART 1 DEFINITIONS AND GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 QUALIFICATIONS AND REGISTRATION OF ELECTORS

PART 3 NOMINATIONS

PART 4 ELECTION JUDGES

PART 5 NOTICE AND PREPARATION FOR ELECTIONS

PART 6 CONDUCT OF ELECTIONS

PART 7 VOTING MACHINES

PART 8 ELECTRONIC VOTING SYSTEMS

PART 9 PAPER BALLOTS

PART 10 ABSENTEE VOTING

PART 11 INDEPENDENT MAIL BALLOT ELECTIONS

PART 12 CHALLENGE OF PERSONS VOTING

PART 13 SURVEY OF RETURNS

PART 14 CONTESTS

PART 15 OTHER JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS

PART 16 ELECTION OFFENSES